District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

26-701

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Nov. 23, 1985, D.C. Law 6-63, § 2, 32 DCR 5954
Apr. 11, 1986, D.C. Law 6-107, § 2(a), 33 DCR 1168
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 27(a), 35 DCR 147
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-187, § 2(a), 35 DCR 8648
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-42, § 2(a), 38 DCR 4981
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 124, 48 DCR 3244

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-801.

Transfer of Functions

Pursuant to Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1992, effective January 20, 1993, unless another date was designated by the Mayor under sec V of the Plan, the D.C. Office of Banking and Financial Institutions (“OBFI”) is hereby transferred from the Deputy Mayor for Economic Development (“DMED”) control center to a separate OBFI control center/responsibility center. OBFI will continue to be administered by the Superintendent and will remain a part of the economic development cluster reporting to the Mayor.